Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.300

License fees.

(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a license. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.

(2) Fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.

(3) The secretary shall establish the fees charged by rule.

[ 2018 c 58 s 41; (2021 c 304 s 29 expired June 30, 2023); 2007 c 17 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.255.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2021 c 304 s 29: "Section 29 of this act expires June 30, 2023." [ 2021 c 304 s 34.]

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.